Arkansas, session 2025, SB569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
(a) The General Assembly finds:
(1) Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1, provides that "[n]o
measure approved by a vote of the people shall be amended or repealed by the
General Assembly. . . except upon a yea and nay vote on roll call of two-
thirds of all the members elected to each house of the General Assembly. .
.";
(2) Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1, defines "measure" to
include any bill, law, resolution, ordinance, charter, constitutional
*MBM188*
03/27/2025 9:51:15 AM MBM188

SB569
amendment or legislative proposal or enactment of any character;
(3) The plain language of the definition of "measure" in
Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1, clearly includes amendments to the
Arkansas Constitution, meaning that the General Assembly may amend amendments
to the Arkansas Constitution with a two-thirds vote of each house;
(4) Despite observing that the definition of "measure" in
Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1 includes "constitutional amendment(s)
'or legislative proposals of any character'", the Supreme Court in Arkansas
Game and Fish Commission v. Edgmon, 218 Ark. 207, 235 S.W.2d 554 (1951),
declined to construe the language literally and held that the General
Assembly lacked the power to amend or repeal amendments to the Arkansas
Constitution by a two-thirds vote of each house;
(5) In Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas v.
Andrews, 2018 Ark. 12 (2018), the Supreme Court overturned years of precedent
by holding that the General Assembly cannot waive by law the state's
sovereign immunity granted by Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 20;
(6) In reaching its decision in Andrews, supra, the Supreme
Court held that the language of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 20,
should be interpreted "precisely as it reads";
(7) In Buonauito v. Gibson, 2020 Ark. 352, the Supreme Court
noted that the phrase "four-lane highway" as used in Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 91, had been "given a specific meaning that is plain and
unambiguous" and thus funds under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 91, could
not be used to improve six-lane portions of interstate highways; and
(8) An interpretation of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1,
"precisely as it reads" clearly leads to the conclusion that the General
Assembly may amend all measures, including constitutional amendments, by a
two-thirds vote of each house, as the term "measure" has been given a plain
and unambiguous definition in Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1.
(b) By the passage of this act, the General Assembly expresses its
belief that, upon consideration of this act using the standard of review
established in Andrews, supra, the Supreme Court will:
(1) Interpret Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1, precisely
as it reads in consideration of its plain and unambiguous language;
(2) Overturn its decision in Edgmon, supra, as inconsistent with
its holding in Andrews, supra, and Buonauito, supra; and
03/27/2025 9:51:15 AM MBM188

SB569
(3) Uphold the constitutional authority of the General Assembly
under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1, to amend or repeal amendments to
the Arkansas Constitution by a two-thirds vote of each house.

SECTION 2. Pursuant to the authority under Arkansas Constitution,
Article 5, § 1, the subsection of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1,
titled "Title" is amended to read as follows:
Title. At the time of filing petitions the exact title to be used on
the ballot shall by the petitioners be submitted with the petition, and on
state-wide measures, shall be submitted to the State Board of Election
Commissioners, who shall certify such title to the Secretary of State, to be
placed upon the ballot; on county and municipal measures such title shall be
submitted to the county election board and shall by said board be placed upon
the ballot in such county or municipal election. The title shall be
readable, clear, and concise and shall not exceed five hundred (500) words.
The General Assembly may enact laws establishing a standard for the
readability of the title.



















03/27/2025 9:51:15 AM MBM188